src/fst/phonology.twolc
!! ==> sourced from phonology-rules/009 <==
!! ============================================================================
"й>0 in lexical endings, and before fleeting vowels, and in comparative adjectives with velar mutation"
й:0 <=> .#. ( %^P: %^A: ) Letter+ V _  %>: ; ! in lexical ending
!!€ музе́й>а
!!€ музе́0>я
        .#. ( %^P: %^A: ) Letter+ V й:й _  %>: ; ! in lexical ending
!!€ Гава́йй>ы
!!€ Гава́й0>и
        .#. ( %^P: %^A: ) Letter+ _ %^F:0 V ; ! before fleeting vowel
!!€ копе́й^Fека>ов
!!€ копе́00ек0>00
        [ г: | к: | х: ] %>: [ е | е́: ] _ ( %^P: ) .#. ; ! comparative adjectives with velar mutation
!!€ ли́х>е́й
!!€ ли́ш>е0

!! ==> sourced from phonology-rules/010 <==
!! ============================================================================
"й>ь (1) when after a fleeting vowel and before a vowel ( муравей > муравья; семей > семья ) (2) in verbs with й-stems, such as бить (3) in imperatives of code 2 on consonant stems"
й:ь <=> :C %^F:0 V: _ ([ я́: | ё: | е́: | я: | е: ]) %>: :V ;
!!€ мурав^Fе́й>а́
!!€ мурав00ь>я́
!!€ бел^Fе́йё>о́
!!€ бел00ь0>ё
        C: %^F:0 V: _ %<: :V ;
!!€ б^Fе́й<у́
!!€ б00ь<ю́
        :C %<: _ ( т е ) ( с [ я: | ь ] ) .#. ;
!!€ вы́бурав<й
!!€ вы́бурав<ь

!! ==> sourced from phonology-rules/011 <==
!! ============================================================================
"Z>0"
%^Z:0 <=> [ VELEnd | HUSHEnd | цEnd | HCEnd | JEnd | FVn0 ] _ .#. ; ! Fem 2*a in н, e.g. столетний~столетен
!!€ но́в>^Z
!!€ но́в>0
!!€ столе́т^Fень>^Z
!!€ столе́т0ен0>0

!! ==> sourced from phonology-rules/012 <==
!! ============================================================================
"Z>ь"
%^Z:ь <=>         :PCNoN ь:0 %>: _ .#. ;
          \[%^F:0] V: н: ь:0 %>: _ .#. ;
!!€ си́нь>^Z
!!€ си́н0>ь
                   C: н: ь:0 %>: _ .#. ;

!! ==> sourced from phonology-rules/013 <==
!! ============================================================================
"Z>й"
%^Z:й <=> \%^F:0 V: й: %>: _ .#. ;
!!€ длинноше́й>^Z
!!€ длинноше́0>й

!! ==> sourced from phonology-rules/014 <==
!! ============================================================================
"о>е"
о:е <=> [ HUSHEnd | цEnd | VEnd | SCEnd | JEnd | jEnd ] _ [ ?* - [ в:0 ?* ] ] .#. ; ! в:0 occurs in zero GenPl and PastAct participles(see rule below)
!!€ хоро́ш>ому
!!€ хоро́ш>ему
!!€ па́ль^Fец>ом
!!€ па́ль00ц>ем
!!€ музе́й>ом
!!€ музе́0>ем
!!€ си́нь>ой
!!€ си́н0>ей
!!€ сча́ст^Fий>ом
!!€ сча́ст00ь>ем
!!€ ва́йя>ой
!!€ ва́й0>ей
!!€ Гава́йй>ов
!!€ Гава́й0>ев

!! ==> sourced from phonology-rules/015 <==
!! ============================================================================
"ы>и (stressed or unstressed)"
Vx:Vy <=> [ VELEnd | HUSHEnd | VEnd | SCEnd | JEnd | jEnd ] _ ;
!!€ кни́га>ы
!!€ кни́г0>и
!!€ хоро́ш>ый
!!€ хоро́ш>ий
!!€ музе́й>ы
!!€ музе́0>и
where Vx in ( ы ы́ )
      Vy in ( и и́ )
    matched;

!! ==> sourced from phonology-rules/016 <==
!! ============================================================================
"ю>у and я>а (stressed or unstressed) after a velar, husher, or ц"  ! This rule does not seem to ever apply for nominals
Vx:Vy <=> [ VELEnd | HUSHEnd | цEnd | VerbHUSH ] _ [ ?* - [ %>: ?* ] ] .#. ;
!!€ слы́ш<ю
!!€ слы́ш<у
!!€ и́ск^M<я́
!!€ и0щ0<а́
where Vx in ( ю ю́ я я́ )
      Vy in ( у у́ а а́ )
    matched;

!! ==> sourced from phonology-rules/017 <==
!! ============================================================================
"[а а́ о́] > [я я́ ё] after soft-consonant stems (including й: муравей, семья, бельё, etc) and vowel stems (музей, критерий, понятие, Мария, etc) including 1st conj verbs like читать, болеть, воевать, etc."
Vx:Vy <=> [ SCEnd | VEnd | JEnd | jEnd ] _ [ ?* - [ [ %>: | в:й | в:0 ] ?* ] ] .#. ;
          1ConjV _ ; ! This does not seem to match anything TODO
where Vx in ( а а́ о́ )
      Vy in ( я я́ ё )
    matched;

!! ==> sourced from phonology-rules/018 <==
!! ============================================================================
"у>ю (1) after soft-consonant stems (including й: муравей, семья, бельё, etc) and vowel stems (музей, критерий, понятие, Мария, etc) including 1st conj verbs like читать, болеть, воевать, etc. (2) in 1st conjugation after л or ь"
Vx:Vy <=> [ SCEnd | VEnd | JEnd | jEnd ] _ [ ?* - [ [ в:й | в:0 ] ?* ] ] .#. ;
          [ 1ConjV | 1ConjJ ] _ ;
          :л %<: _ ;
          %^R:р %<: _ ; ! Verbs in ~роть
where Vx in ( у у́ )
      Vy in ( ю ю́ )
    matched;

!! ==> sourced from phonology-rules/019 <==
!! ============================================================================
"е>и after и-stems (e.g. о Марии)"
е:и <=> [ и | и́ ] [ я́:0 | ё:0 | е́:0 | я:0 | е:0 | й:0 ]  %>: _ .#. ;

!! ==> sourced from phonology-rules/020 <==
!! ============================================================================
"в>й: GenPl ей"
в:й <=> [ HUSHEndC | SCEndC ] [ о: | о́: ] _ .#. ;
        [ HUSHEndV | SCEndV ] о́: _ .#. ;

!! ==> sourced from phonology-rules/021 <==
!! ============================================================================
"о́>е́: GenPl stressed е́й"
о́:е́ <=> [ HUSHEndC | HUSHEndV | SCEndC | SCEndV ] _ в:й .#. ;

!! ==> sourced from phonology-rules/022 <==
!! ============================================================================
"в>0: (1) GenPl zero and (2) Masc past tense endings or past deverbals, after consonant stems"
в:0 <=> [ VELEndV | цEndV | HCEndV | VEndV | JEndV | jEndV ] [ о: | о́: ] _ .#. ;
        HUSHEndV о: _ .#. ;
        SCEndV о: _ .#. ;
        :C %<: _ ( ш и ( с :ь ) ) .#. ; ! Past verbal adverb (handled by lexc)
        :C %<: _ ш %>: ; ! Past active ppl (see Zaliznjak intro pg 85) л>вший, no л +ший EXCEPTION: 7-сти (-д-) or (-т-) > дший/тший uses %^d/%^t

!! ==> sourced from phonology-rules/023 <==
!! ============================================================================
"о>ь: GenPl zero after soft C"
о:ь <=> SCEndVNoN _ в:0 .#. ; ! However, Fem 2*a in ~ня go to 0, not ь (characterized by F V н я)
        \[%^F:0] V: н: я:0 %>: _ в:0 .#. ; ! However, Fem 2*a in н, e.g. башня~башен
        C: н: [ е́:0 | е:0 | ё:0 | я́:0 ] %>: _ в:0 .#. ;

!! ==> sourced from phonology-rules/024 <==
!! ============================================================================
"[оо́]>й: GenPl zero after V"
[ о:й | о́:й ] <=> VEndV _ в:0 .#. ;

!! ==> sourced from phonology-rules/025 <==
!! ============================================================================
"P>п in comparatives"
%^P:п <=> .#. _ %^A: ?* %>: [ е | е́: ] [ е: | й: ] %^P:0 .#. ;

!! ==> sourced from phonology-rules/026 <==
!! ============================================================================
"A>о in comparatives"
%^A:о <=> .#. %^P: _ ?* %>: [ е | е́: ] [ е: | й: ] %^P:0 .#. ;

!! ==> sourced from phonology-rules/027 <==
!! ============================================================================
"е́>е in comparative adjective ending after velar mutation"
! ли́х>е́е
! ли́ш0е0
е́:е <=> [ г: | к: | х: ] %>: _ [ е: | й: ] (%^P:0) .#. ;

!! ==> sourced from phonology-rules/028 <==
!! ============================================================================
"г>ж (1) with comparative(-ее) adjectives (2) with ^M symbol (verbs) (3) in pres/fut before е/ё"
г:ж <=> _ %>: [ е | е́: ] [ е: | й: ] ( %^P: ) .#. ;
        _ %^M: ;
        _ %<: [ е: | ё: ] ;
        ! TODO make ~ейший productive in lexc (ш: V: Letter: (V:))

!! ==> sourced from phonology-rules/029 <==
!! ============================================================================
"х>ш (1) with comparative(-ее) adjectives (2) with ^M symbol (verbs)"
х:ш <=> _ %>: [ е | е́: ] [ е: | й: ] ( %^P: ) .#. ;
        _ %^M: ;
        ! TODO make ~ейший productive in lexc (ш: V: Letter: (V:))

!! ==> sourced from phonology-rules/030 <==
!! ============================================================================
"к>ч Velar mutation (1) with comparative(-ее) adjectives (2) with ^M symbol (verbs) (as opposed to ск>щ) (3) in pres/fut before е/ё"
к:ч <=> _ %>: [ е | е́: ] [ е: | й: ] ( %^P: ) .#. ;
   \с:0 _ %^M: ;
     \т _ %<: [ е: | ё: ] ; ! печёшь, but ткёшь
        ! TODO make ~ейший productive in lexc (ш: V: Letter: (V:))

!! ==> sourced from phonology-rules/031 <==
!! ============================================================================
"т>ч (1) Pres/Fut mutation of т (as opposed to ст>щ); (2) гть/кть > 0чь"
т:ч <=>              \с: _ %^M: ;
        [ г: | к: ] %<: _ ь ( с я ) .#. ;

!! ==> sourced from phonology-rules/032 <==
!! ============================================================================
"[гк]>0 before infinitive ending: гть/кть > чь"
Cx:0 <=> _ %<: т: ь ( с я ) .#. ;
where Cx in ( г к ) ;

!! ==> sourced from phonology-rules/033 <==
!! ============================================================================
"ё>е́ in some infinitives (чь and [бдт...]сть)"
ё:е́ <=> _ [ г: | к: ] %<: т: ь ( с я ) .#. ;
        _ [ б: | д: | с | (с) т:с ] %<: т ь ( с я ) .#. ;

!! ==> sourced from phonology-rules/034 <==
!! ============================================================================
"[дтdt]>0 before past tense"
Cx:0 <=> _ %<: л ( [ V ( с :ь ) | с [ :я | :я́ ] ] ) .#.  ;
where Cx in ( д т %^d %^t ) ;

!! ==> sourced from phonology-rules/035 <==
!! ============================================================================
"[дт]>в before past active deverbals" ! NB! Compare меtший etc.
Cx:в <=> _ %<: ( в:0 ) ш и ( с ь ) .#. ;
         _ %<: в:0 .#. ;
         _ %<: в:0 ш %>: ;
where Cx in ( д т ) ;

!! ==> sourced from phonology-rules/036 <==
!! ============================================================================
"[бдтdt]>с in before infinitive endings"
Cx:с <=> _ %<: т ( [ и́ ( с :ь ) | ь ( с я ) ] ) .#.  ;
         $[ :в :ы́ ] _ %<: т ( и ( с :ь ) ) .#.  ;
where Cx in ( б д т %^d %^t ) ;

!! ==> sourced from phonology-rules/037 <==
!! ============================================================================
"с>0 before т>щ and к>щ stem mutations"
с:0 <=> _ [ к: | т: ] %^M: ;

!! ==> sourced from phonology-rules/038 <==
!! ============================================================================
"с[ к т ]>щ Mutation of ск and ст"
Cx:щ <=> с:0 _ %^M: ;
where Cx in ( к т ) ;

!! ==> sourced from phonology-rules/039 <==
!! ============================================================================
"[ з с д T D ] > [ ж ш ж щ ж ] Verb stem mutations with ^M symbol (г к х covered in another rule)"
Cx:Cy <=> _ %^M: ;
where Cx in ( д з с %^T %^D )
      Cy in ( ж ж ш щ   ж )
      matched ;

!! ==> sourced from phonology-rules/040 <==
!! ============================================================================
"M>л Addition of л after labials in 'mutation' with ^M symbol (verbs)"
%^M:л <=> [ б: | п: | в: | ф: | м: ] _ ;

!! ==> sourced from phonology-rules/041 <==
!! ============================================================================
"M>д in DM>жд mutation"
%^M:д <=> %^D: _ [ е: | ё: ] н ( н ) %>: ;

!! ==> sourced from phonology-rules/042 <==
!! ============================================================================
"л>0 in Masc past tense after consonant stems"
л:0 <=> CNoDT: %<: _ ( с я ) .#. ;

!! ==> sourced from phonology-rules/043 <==
!! ============================================================================
"S>0 in imperatives with й stems (e.g. бить, вить, лить, пить, шить)"
%^S:0 <=>                                                                й %<: _ ( т е ) ( с [ я: | ь ] ) .#. ;

!! ==> sourced from phonology-rules/044 <==
!! ============================================================================
"S>и́ in imperatives with consonant stems"
%^S:и́ <=>                                               [ :C - :й ] (%^M:) %<: _ ( т е ) ( с [ я: | ь ] ) .#. ;

!! ==> sourced from phonology-rules/045 <==
!! ============================================================================
"[SU]>й in Imperatives with vowel stems"
Ex:й <=>                                                                :V %<: _ ( т е ) ( с [ я: | ь ] ) .#. ;
where Ex in ( %^U %^S ) ;
